src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/A-lakw09_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lakõ2: # Noun (9) lakõ2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     lakõ+A+Sg+Nom: lakõ
     lakõ+A+Sg+Gen: [lakõ, lagõhõ]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Par: [lakõt, lagõhõt]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Ill: [lakkõhe, lagõhõhe, lakkõdõ, lagõhõdõ]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Ine: [lakõn, lakõh, lakõhn, lagõhõn, lagõhõh, lagõhõhn]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Ela: [lakõst, lagõhõst]
     lakõ+A+Sg+All: [lakõlõ, lagõhõlõ]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Ade: [lakõl, lagõhõl]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Abl: [lakõlt, lagõhõlt]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Tra: [lakõs, lagõhõs]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Ter: [lakõniq, lagõhõniq]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Abe: [lakõldaq, lagõhõldaq]
     lakõ+A+Sg+Com: [lakõgaq, lagõhõgaq]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Nom: [lakõq, lagõhõq]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Gen: [lakkidõ, lagõhidõ, lakkiidõ, lagõhiidõ]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Par: [lakkit, lagõhit, lakkiid,  lagõhiid]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Ill: [lakkihe, lagõhihe, lakkiihe, lagõhiihe, lakkidõ, lakkiidõ, lagõhiidõ]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Ine: [lakkin, lagõhin, lagõhiin, lakkih, lakkiin, lakkiihn, lakkiih, lagõhih, lagõhiih, lakkihn, lagõhihn, lagõhiihn]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Ela: [lakkist, lagõhist, lakkiist, lagõhiist]
     lakõ+A+Pl+All: [lakkilõ, lagõhilõ, lakkiilõ, lagõhiilõ]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Ade: [lakkil, lagõhil, lakkiil, lagõhiil]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Abl: [lakkilt, lagõhilt, lakkiilt, lagõhiilt]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Tra: [lakkis, lagõhis, lakkiis, lagõhiis]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Ter: [lakkiniq, lagõhiniq, lakkiiniq, lagõhiiniq]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Abe: [lakkildaq, lagõhildaq, lakkiildaq, lagõhiildaq]
     lakõ+A+Pl+Com: [lakkidõgaq, lagõhidõgaq, lakkiidõgaq, lagõhiidõgaq]
